Massachusetts, session 194th, H335.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 87DDD1/2 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence: - Any fee shall only
be paid by the party, lessor or tenant who originally engaged and entered into a contract with the
licensed broker or salesman.
of 1